test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-14pereh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pereh: # Noun (14RITSʼKAS =>PEREH) pereh 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     pereh+N+Sg+Nom: pereh
     pereh+N+Sg+Gen: perre
     pereh+N+Sg+Par: pereht
     pereh+N+Sg+Ill: [perrehe, perrede]
     pereh+N+Sg+Ine: [perren, perreh, perrehn]
     pereh+N+Sg+Ela: perrest
     pereh+N+Sg+All: perrele
     pereh+N+Sg+Ade: perrel
     pereh+N+Sg+Abl: perrelt
     pereh+N+Sg+Tra: perres
     pereh+N+Sg+Ter: perreniq
     pereh+N+Sg+Abe: perreldäq
     pereh+N+Sg+Com: perregaq
     pereh+N+Pl+Nom: perreq
     pereh+N+Pl+Gen: [perride, perriide, perehte]
     pereh+N+Pl+Par: [perrit, perriid]
     pereh+N+Pl+Ill: [perrihe, perriihe, perride, perriide, perehtehe, perehtede]
     pereh+N+Pl+Ine: [perrin, perriin, perrih, perriih, perrihn, perriihn, perehten, perehteh, perehtehn]
     pereh+N+Pl+Ela: [perrist, perriist, perehtest]
     pereh+N+Pl+All: [perrile, perriile, perehtele]
     pereh+N+Pl+Ade: [perril, perriil, perehtel]
     pereh+N+Pl+Abl: [perrilt, perriilt, perehtelt]
     pereh+N+Pl+Tra: [perris, perriis, perehtes]
     pereh+N+Pl+Ter: [perriniq, perriiniq, perehteniq]
     pereh+N+Pl+Abe: [perrildäq, perriildäq, perehteldäq]
     pereh+N+Pl+Com: [perridegaq, perriidegaq, perehtegaq]
